Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 4. Private Security Services Businesses.
§ 9.1-140.
Exceptions from article; training requirements for out-of-state central station dispatchers.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to:

An officer or employee of the United States, the Commonwealth, or a political subdivision of either, while the officer or employee is performing his official duties;

A person, except a private investigator as defined in §

9.1-138

, engaged exclusively in the business of obtaining and furnishing information regarding an individual’s financial rating or a person engaged in the business of a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Federal Fair Credit Reporting Act;

An attorney licensed to practice in Virginia or his employees;

The legal owner of personal property which has been sold under any security agreement while performing acts relating to the repossession of such property;

A person receiving compensation for private employment as a security officer, or receiving compensation under the terms of a contract, express or implied, as a security officer, who is also a law-enforcement officer as defined by §

9.1-101

and employed by the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions;

Any person appointed under § 46.2-2003 or 56-353 while engaged in the employment contemplated thereunder, unless they have successfully completed training mandated by the Department;

Persons who conduct investigations as a part of the services being provided as a claims adjuster, by a claims adjuster who maintains an ongoing claims adjusting business, and any natural person employed by the claims adjuster to conduct investigations for the claims adjuster as a part of the services being provided as a claims adjuster;

Any natural person otherwise required to be registered pursuant to §

9.1-139

who is employed by a business that is not a private security services business for the performance of his duties for his employer. Any such employee, however, who carries a firearm and is in direct contact with the general public in the performance of his duties shall possess a valid registration with the Department as required by this article;

Persons, sometimes known as “shoppers,” employed to purchase goods or services solely for the purpose of determining or assessing the efficiency, loyalty, courtesy, or honesty of the employees of a business establishment;

Licensed or registered private investigators from other states entering Virginia during an investigation originating in their state of licensure or registration when the other state offers similar reciprocity to private investigators licensed and registered by the Commonwealth;

Unarmed regular employees of telephone public service companies where the regular duties of such employees consist of protecting the property of their employers and investigating the usage of telephone services and equipment furnished by their employers, their employers’ affiliates, and other communications common carriers;

An end user;

A material supplier who renders advice concerning the use of products sold by an electronics security business and who does not provide installation, monitoring, repair or maintenance services for electronic security equipment;

Members of the security forces who are directly employed by electric public service companies;

Any professional engineer or architect licensed in accordance with Chapter 4 (§

54.1-400

et seq.) of Title 54.1 to practice in the Commonwealth, or his employees;

Any person who only performs telemarketing or schedules appointments without access to information concerning the electronic security equipment purchased by an end user;

Any certified forensic scientist employed as an expert witness for the purpose of possibly testifying as an expert witness;

Members of the security forces who are directly employed by shipyards engaged in the construction, design, overhaul or repair of nuclear vessels for the United States Navy;

An out-of-state central station dispatcher employed by a private security services business licensed by the Department provided he (i) possesses and maintains a valid license, registration, or certification as a central station dispatcher issued by the regulatory authority of the state in which he performs the monitoring duties and (ii) has submitted his fingerprints to the regulatory authority for the conduct of a national criminal history records search;

Any person, or independent contractor or employee of any person, who (i) exclusively contracts directly with an agency of the federal government to conduct background investigations and (ii) possesses credentials issued by such agency authorizing such person, subcontractor or employee to conduct background investigations;

Any person whose occupation is limited to the technical reconstruction of the cause of accidents involving motor vehicles as defined in §

46.2-100

, regardless of whether the information resulting from the investigation is to be used before a court, board, officer, or investigative committee, and who is not otherwise a private investigator as defined in §

9.1-138

;

Retail merchants performing locksmith services, selling locks or engaged in key cutting activities conducted at the business location who do not represent themselves to the general public as locksmiths;

Law-enforcement, fire, rescue, emergency service personnel, or other persons performing locksmith services in an emergency situation without compensation and who do not represent themselves to the general public as locksmiths;

Motor vehicle dealers as defined in §

46.2-1500

performing locksmith services who do not represent themselves to the general public as locksmiths;

Taxicab and towing businesses performing locksmith services that do not represent themselves to the general public as locksmiths;

Contractors licensed under Chapter 11 (§

54.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 54.1 performing locksmith services when acting within the scope of such license who do not represent themselves to the general public as locksmiths;

Any contractor as defined in §

54.1-1100

(i) who is exempt from the licensure requirements of Chapter 11 (§

54.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 54.1, (ii) where the total value referred to in a single contract or project is less than $1,000, (iii) when the performance of locksmith services is ancillary to the work performed by such contractor, and (iv) who does not represent himself to the general public as a locksmith;

Any individual, employed by a retail merchant that also holds a private security services business license as a locksmith, where such individual’s duties relating to such license are limited to key cutting and the key cutting is performed under the direct supervision of the licensee;

Any individual engaged in (i) computer or digital forensic services as defined in §

9.1-138

or in the acquisition, review, or analysis of digital or computer-based information, in order to obtain or furnish information for evidentiary purposes or to provide expert testimony before a court, or (ii) network or system vulnerability testing, including network scans and risk assessment and analysis of computers connected to a network;

Employees and sales representatives of a retailer of electronic security equipment, provided such employees and sales representatives (i) sell electronic security equipment at a store location, online, or by telephone, but not at the end user’s premises; (ii) are not electronic security technicians; and (iii) do not have access to end user confidential information regarding the end user’s electronic security equipment; or

A certified public accountant authorized to practice in the Commonwealth under Chapter 44 (§

54.1-4400

et seq.) of Title 54.1 or his employees.

History.

1976, c. 737, § 54-729.28; 1977, c. 376, § 54.1-1901; 1981, c. 538; 1983, c. 569; 1984, c. 375; 1988, c. 765; 1992, c. 578, § 9-183.2; 1994, cc. 45, 810; 1995, c. 79; 1996, cc. 541, 543, 576; 1997, cc. 80, 204; 2000, c. 26; 2001, cc. 388, 650, 821, 844; 2002, cc. 578, 597; 2003, c. 136; 2008, c. 638; 2009, c. 225; 2011, c. 263; 2013, c. 411; 2014, c. 214.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 388, 650 and 821 amended former § 9-183.2, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2001, cc. 388, 650 and 821 have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Section 46.2-2003, referred to in subdivision 6, was repealed effective July 1, 2002, by Acts 2001, c. 596.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 388 inserted “or receiving compensation under the terms of a contract, express or implied, as a security officer” in subdivision 5.

The 2001 amendment by c. 650 deleted “or a person engaged in the business of a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Federal Fair Credit Reporting Act” at the end of the first sentence of subdivision 2.

The 2001 amendment by c. 821, inserted “except a private investigator as defined in §

9.1-138

,” in the first sentence of subdivision 2, and made stylistic changes in that subdivision as it read prior to the amendment by Acts 2001, c. 650; substituted the language beginning “conduct investigations as a part of the services” for “are regularly employed to investigate accidents or to adjust claims and who do not carry weapons in the performance of their duties” at the end of subdivision 7; rewrote the first sentence of subdivision 8, which formerly read: “Regular employees of persons engaged in other than the private private security services business, where the regular duties of such employees primarily consist of protecting the property of their employers”; inserted “however,” near the beginning of the second sentence of subdivision 8, and substituted “the Department as required by this article” for “this Department as provided in subsection B of §

9.1-139

” at the end of the second sentence; deleted the last sentence of subdivision B, which defined the term “General public”; and added present subdivision 20.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 136 added subdivision 21.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 638 made a stylistic change in subdivision 6 and added subdivisions 22 through 27.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 225 added subdivision 28.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 263 added subdivision 29.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 411 substituted “Law-enforcement” for “Law enforcement” in subdivision 23; added subdivision 30; made a minor stylistic change and made punctuation changes throughout the section.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 214, in subdivision 3, deleted “or certified public accountant” following “attorney” and added subdivision 31.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Licensing requirement. —

When an employee installing wiring or equipment used to support electronic security equipment has access to “confidential information concerning the design, extent, status . . . or location of an end user’s electronic security equipment,” the contractor or subcontractor employing this individual must obtain a license from the Department of Criminal Justice Services as required by §

9.1-138

, et seq. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William K. Barlow, Member, House of Delegates, 10-115, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 13 (2/25/11).

§ 9.1-140.01.
Exemption from training requirements; central station dispatchers employed by central stations certified by a Nationally Recognized Testing Laboratory.

Central station dispatchers employed by a central station that is certified by a Nationally Recognized Testing Laboratory (NRTL) shall be exempt from the training requirements of this article. For the purposes of this section, “Nationally Recognized Testing Laboratory” means the designation given by the federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) to a private sector testing facility that provides product safety testing and certification services.

History.

2014, c. 610.

§ 9.1-140.1.
Registration; waiver of examination; locksmiths.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, unless an applicant is found by the Board to have engaged in any act that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action, the Board shall issue a registration, without examination, to any applicant who provides satisfactory proof to the Board of having been actively and continuously providing locksmith services immediately prior to July 1, 2008, for at least two years.

History.

2008, c. 638.

§ 9.1-141.
Powers of Board relating to private security services business.

The Board may adopt regulations in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), establishing compulsory minimum, entry-level, in-service, and advanced training standards for persons employed by private security services businesses in classifications defined in §

9.1-138

. The regulations may include provisions delegating to the Board’s staff the right to inspect the facilities and programs of persons conducting training to ensure compliance with the law and Board regulations. In establishing compulsory training standards for each of the classifications defined in §

9.1-138

, the Board shall be guided by the policy of this section to secure the public safety and welfare against incompetent or unqualified persons engaging in the activities regulated by this section and Article 4 (§

9.1-138

et seq.) of this chapter. The regulations may provide for partial exemption from such compulsory, entry-level training for persons having previous employment as law-enforcement officers for a local, state or the federal government, to include units of the United States armed forces, or for persons employed in classifications defined in § 9.1-138. However, no such exemption shall be granted to persons having less than five continuous years of such employment, nor shall an exemption be provided for any person whose employment as a law-enforcement officer or whose employment as a private security services business employee was terminated because of his misconduct or incompetence. The regulations may include separate provisions for full exemption from compulsory training for persons having previous training that meets or exceeds the minimum training standards and has been approved by the Department. However, no such exemption shall be granted to persons whose employment as a private security services business employee was terminated because of his misconduct or incompetence. No regulation adopted by the Board shall prevent any person employed by an electronic security business, other than an alarm respondent, or as a locksmith from carrying a firearm in the course of his duties when such person carries with him a valid concealed handgun permit issued in accordance with Article 6.1 (§

18.2-307.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2.

The Board may enter into an agreement with other states for reciprocity or recognition of private security services businesses and their employees, duly licensed by such states. The agreements shall allow those businesses and their employees to provide and perform private security services within the Commonwealth to secure the public safety and welfare against incompetent, unqualified, unscrupulous, or unfit persons engaging in the activities of private security services businesses.

The Board may adopt regulations in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) to secure the public safety and welfare against incompetent, unqualified, unscrupulous, or unfit persons engaging in the activities of private security services businesses that:

Establish the qualifications of applicants for registration, certification, or licensure under Article 4 (§

9.1-138

) of this chapter;

Examine, or cause to be examined, the qualifications of each applicant for registration, certification, or licensure, including when necessary the preparation, administration, and grading of examinations;

Certify qualified applicants for private security training schools and instructors or license qualified applicants as practitioners of private security services businesses;

Levy and collect fees for registration, certification, or licensure and renewal that are sufficient to cover all expenses for administration and operation of a program of registration, certification, and licensure for private security services businesses and training schools;

Are necessary to ensure continued competency, and to prevent deceptive or misleading practices by practitioners and effectively administer the regulatory system adopted by the Board;

Receive complaints concerning the conduct of any person whose activities are regulated by the Board, to conduct investigations, and to take appropriate disciplinary action if warranted; and

Revoke, suspend or fail to renew a registration, certification, or license for just cause as enumerated in Board regulations.

In adopting its regulations under subsections A and C, the Board shall seek the advice of the Private Security Services Advisory Board established pursuant to §

9.1-143

.

History.

1981, c. 632, § 9-182; 1990, c. 354; 1992, c. 578; 1994, cc. 45, 335, 810; 1995, c. 79; 1998, cc. 122, 807; 2001, c. 844; 2009, c. 375; 2013, c. 69; 2014, c. 32.

Cross references.

As to registration requirements for special conservators of the peace, see §

19.2-13

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Article 6.1 (§

18.2-307.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2” was substituted for “§

18.2-308

” in subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 375, in subsection A, in the fourth sentence, inserted “partial,” “compulsory, entry-level,” “local” and “to include units of the United States Armed Forces, or for persons employed in classifications defined in §

9.1-138

”; inserted “or whose employment as a private security services business employee” in the fifth sentence; in the sixth sentence, inserted “separate” and deleted “or for persons employed in classifications defined in §

9.1-138

” following “Department”; and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “However, no exemption shall be granted to persons having less than five continuous years of such employment, nor shall an exemption be provided for any person whose employment as a private security services business employee was terminated because of his misconduct or incompetence.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 69, in subsection A, substituted “armed forces” for “Armed Forces” in the fourth sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 32, in subsection A, substituted “full” for “partial” in the sixth sentence and inserted the second-to-last sentence.

§ 9.1-142.
Powers of Department relating to private security services businesses.

In addition to the powers otherwise conferred upon it by law, the Department may:

Charge each applicant for licensure, certification or registration a nonrefundable fee as established by the Board to cover the costs of the Department for processing an application for a registration, certification or license, and enforcement of these regulations, and other costs associated with the maintenance of this program of regulation.

Charge nonrefundable fees for private security services training as established by the Board for processing school certifications and enforcement of training standards.

Conduct investigations to determine the suitability of applicants for registration, licensure, or certification of compliance agents, training schools, and instructors. For purposes of this investigation, the Department shall have access to criminal history record information maintained by the Central Criminal Records Exchange of the Department of State Police and shall conduct a background investigation, to include a National Criminal Records search and a Virginia Criminal History Records search.

Issue subpoenas. The Director or a designated subordinate may make an ex parte application to the circuit court for the city or county wherein evidence sought is kept or wherein a licensee does business, for the issuance of a subpoena duces tecum in furtherance of the investigation of a sworn complaint within the jurisdiction of the Department or the Board to request production of any relevant records, documents and physical or other evidence of any person, partnership, association or corporation licensed or regulated by the Department pursuant to this article. The court may issue and compel compliance with such a subpoena upon a showing of reasonable cause. Upon determining that reasonable cause exists to believe that evidence may be destroyed or altered, the court may issue a subpoena duces tecum requiring the immediate production of evidence.

Recover costs of the investigation and adjudication of violations of this article or Board regulations. Such costs may be recovered from the respondent when a sanction is imposed to fine or place on probation, suspend, revoke, or deny the issuance of any license, certification, or registration. Such costs shall be in addition to any monetary penalty which may be imposed. All costs recovered shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the Private Security Services Regulatory Fund.

Institute proceedings to enjoin any person from engaging in any lawful act enumerated in §

9.1-147

. Such proceedings shall be brought in the name of the Commonwealth by the Department in circuit court of the city or county in which the unlawful act occurred or in which the defendant resides.

The Director, or agents appointed by him, shall be vested with the authority to administer oaths or affirmations for the purpose of receiving complaints and conducting investigations of violations of this article, or any Board regulation promulgated pursuant to authority given by this article. Information concerning alleged criminal violations shall be turned over to law-enforcement officers in appropriate jurisdictions. Agents shall be vested with authority to serve such paper or process issued by the Department or the Board under regulations approved by the Board.

History.

1976, c. 737, § 54-729.30; 1977, c. 376, § 54.1-1903; 1984, cc. 57, 779; 1985, c. 448; 1988, c. 765; 1991, c. 589; 1992, c. 578, § 9-183.4; 1994, c. 46; 1998, cc. 122, 807; 2001, c. 844.

§ 9.1-143.
Private Security Services Advisory Board; membership.

The Private Security Services Advisory Board is established as an advisory board within the meaning of §

2.2-2100

, in the executive branch of state government. The Private Security Services Advisory Board shall consist of 15 members as follows: two members shall be private investigators; two shall be representatives of electronic security businesses; two members shall be representatives of locksmith businesses; three shall be representatives of private security services businesses providing security officers, armed couriers, detector canine handlers, or security canine handlers; one shall be a representative of a private security services business providing armored car personnel; one shall be a representative of a private security services business involving personal protection specialists; one shall be a certified private security services instructor; one shall be a special conservator of the peace appointed pursuant to §

19.2-13

; one shall be a licensed bail bondsman and one shall be a representative of law enforcement. The Private Security Services Advisory Board shall be appointed by the Criminal Justice Services Board and shall advise the Criminal Justice Services Board on all issues relating to regulation of private security services businesses.

History.

1976, c. 737, § 54-729.30; 1977, c. 376, § 54.1-1904; 1984, cc. 57, 779; 1985, c. 448; 1988, c. 765; 1992, c. 578, § 9-183.5; 1994, c. 810; 1997, c. 79; 2001, c. 844; 2003, c. 922; 2004, c. 460; 2008, c. 638; 2009, c. 375.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 460, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for § 16.1-77, shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2008, c. 638, cl. 2 provides: “That the Criminal Justice Services Board shall adopt reasonable regulations in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2008, c. 638, cl. 3 provides: “That, in addition to the requirements of §§

2.2-4007.01

and

2.2-4007.02

, during the promulgation of regulations in accordance with the second enactment of this act, the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall meet with representatives of the various locksmith organizations and other interested parties to solicit input from such organizations and persons in the formation and development of regulations concerning (i) the appropriate educational and training requirements for locksmiths and (ii) the Department’s investigation of complaints against its locksmith regulants, including the process by which anonymous complaints will be handled by the Department pursuant to the requirements of Article 3 (§

2.2-4018

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2. For the purposes of clause (i), the educational and training requirements, to the extent practicable, shall not exceed such requirements for electronic security businesses.”

Acts 2008, c. 638, cl. 4 provides: “That the Board of Criminal Justice Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective by July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2008, c. 638, cl. 5 provides: “That the registration requirements of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2008. Applicants for licensing and registration for locksmiths may submit an application to the Department on or after July 1, 2008.” At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment by Acts 2008, c. 638 to subsection C of §

9.1-139

was effective October 1, 2008.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 922, in the second sentence, substituted “12” for “eleven,” and inserted “one shall be a special conservator of the peace appointed pursuant to §

19.2-13

.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 460, effective July 1, 2005, in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “13” for “12” and inserted “one shall be a licensed bail bondsman” near the end.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 638 substituted “15 members” for “13 members” and inserted “two members shall be representatives of locksmith businesses” in the second sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 375 substituted “armed couriers, detector canine handlers, or security canine handlers” for “armed couriers, or guard dog handlers” in the second sentence.

§ 9.1-144.
Insurance required.

In order for his license or certificate to be operative, any person licensed as a private security services business under subsection A of §

9.1-139

or certified as a private security services training school under subsection B of §

9.1-139

shall file with the Department evidence of a policy of liability insurance in an amount and with coverage as fixed by the Department. The liability insurance shall be maintained for so long as the licensee or certificate holder is licensed or certified by the Department.

Every personal protection specialist and private investigator who has been issued a registration by the Department and is hired as an independent contractor by a licensed private security services business shall maintain comprehensive general liability insurance in a reasonable amount to be fixed by the Department, evidence of which shall be provided to the private security services business prior to the hiring of such independent contractor pursuant to subsection C of §

9.1-139

.

History.

1976, c. 737, § 54-729.31; 1988, c. 765, § 54.1-1905; 1992, c. 578, § 9-183.6; 1998, cc. 122, 807; 2001, c. 844; 2015, c. 202; 2018, c. 214.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 202 added the second paragraph in subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 214 deleted the subsection A designation and rewrote the first paragraph, and deleted subsection B, pertaining to recovery on the bond licensee or certificate holder in the case of an unsatisfied judgment.

§ 9.1-145.
Fingerprints required; penalty.

Each applicant for initial registration, licensure or certification as a compliance agent, private security services training school or instructor or unarmed security officer under the provisions of this article and every person employed as an electronic security employee or electronic security technician’s assistant shall submit his fingerprints to the Department on a form provided by the Department. The Department shall use the applicant’s fingerprints and personal descriptive information for the conduct of a National Criminal Records search and a Virginia Criminal History Records search.

Each currently certified unarmed security officer applying for renewal between January 1, 2003, and December 31, 2004, shall submit his fingerprints to the Department on a form provided by the Department. The Department shall use the applicant’s fingerprints and personal descriptive information for the conduct of a National Criminal Records search and a Virginia Criminal History Records search.

The Department may suspend the registration, license or certification of any applicant who is subsequently convicted of a misdemeanor involving (i) moral turpitude, (ii) assault and battery, (iii) damage to real or personal property, (iv) controlled substances or imitation controlled substances as defined in Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2, (v) prohibited sexual behavior as described in Article 7 (§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2, or (vi) firearms or any felony.

Any person willfully and intentionally making a false statement in the personal descriptive information required on the fingerprint card is guilty of a Class 5 felony.

History.

1976, c. 737, § 54-729.32; 1988, c. 765, § 54.1-1906; 1992, c. 578, § 9-183.7; 1994, c. 810; 1995, c. 79; 1998, cc. 122, 807; 2001, c. 844; 2002, cc. 578, 597.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 578 and 597 are almost identical, and added the subsection A designation; in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “initial,” deleted “or” preceding “private,” and inserted “or unarmed security officer,” and added the second sentence; and added subsections B, C, and D.
In addition, c. 578 added “; penalty” to the section catchline.

§ 9.1-146.
Limitation on powers of registered armed security officers.

Compliance with the provisions of this article shall not itself authorize any person to carry a concealed weapon or exercise any powers of a conservator of the peace. A registered armed security officer of a private security services business while at a location which the business is contracted to protect shall have the power to effect an arrest for an offense occurring (i) in his presence on such premises or (ii) in the presence of a merchant, agent, or employee of the merchant the private security business has contracted to protect, if the merchant, agent, or employee had probable cause to believe that the person arrested had shoplifted or committed willful concealment of goods as contemplated by §

18.2-106

. For the purposes of §

19.2-74

, a registered armed security officer of a private security services business shall be considered an arresting officer.

History.

1976, c. 737, § 54-729.33; 1978, c. 560, § 54.1-1907; 1980, c. 425; 1988, cc. 48, 765; 1992, c. 578, § 9-183.8; 1994, c. 45; 2001, c. 844.

§ 9.1-147.
Unlawful conduct generally; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Practice any trade or profession licensed, certified or registered under this article without obtaining the necessary license, certification or registration required by statute or regulation;

Materially misrepresent facts in an application for licensure, certification or registration;

Willfully refuse to furnish the Department information or records required or requested pursuant to statute or regulation; and

Violate any statute or regulation governing the practice of the private security services businesses or training schools regulated by this article.

Any person who is convicted of willful violation of subsection A shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any person convicted of a third or subsequent offense under this section during a thirty-six-month period shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

1992, c. 578, § 9-183.11; 1998, cc. 122, 807; 2001, c. 844.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 9.1-148.
Unlawful procurement of a license; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Procure, or assist another to procure, through theft, fraud or other illegal means, a registration or license, by giving to, or receiving from, any person any information, oral, written or printed, during the administration of the examination, which is intended to, or will, assist any person taking the examination in passing the examination and obtaining the required registration or license;

Attempt to procure, through theft, fraud or other illegal means, any questions intended to be used by the Department conducting the examination, or the answers to the questions;

Promise or offer any valuable or other consideration to a person having access to the questions or answers as an inducement to procure for delivery to the promisor, or any other person, a copy of any questions or answers.

No person, other than a designee of the Department, shall procure or have in his possession prior to the beginning of an examination, without written authority of the Department, any question intended to be used by the Department, or receive or furnish to any person taking the examination, prior to or during the examination, any written or printed material purporting to be answers to, or aid in answering such questions;

If an examination is divided into separate parts, each of the parts shall be deemed an examination for the purposes of this section.

Any person convicted of a violation of subsections A or B shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1992, c. 578, § 9-183.10; 2001, c. 844.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 9.1-149.
Unlicensed activity prohibited; penalty.

No person:

Required to possess a registration under subsection C of §

9.1-139

shall be employed by a private security services business, except as provided in this article, as armored car personnel, courier, armed security officer, security canine handler, personal protection specialist, private investigator, alarm respondent, central station dispatcher, electronic security sales representative or electronic security technician without possessing a valid registration.

Licensed or required to be licensed under subsection A of §

9.1-139

shall employ or otherwise utilize, except as provided in this article, as armored car personnel, courier, armed security officer, security canine handler, personal protection specialist, private investigator, alarm respondent, central station dispatcher, electronic security sales representative or electronic security technician, any person not possessing a valid registration.

Required to possess an instructor certification under subsection D of § 9.1-139 shall provide mandated instruction, except as provided in §

9.1-141

and Board regulations, without possessing a valid private security instructor certification.

Certified or required to be certified as a private security services training school under subsection B of § 9.1-139 shall employ or otherwise utilize, except as provided in §

9.1-141

and Board regulations, as a private security instructor, any person not possessing a valid instructor certification.

No compliance agent employed or otherwise utilized by a person licensed or required to be licensed under subsection A of §

9.1-139

shall:

Employ or otherwise utilize as an unarmed security officer, except as provided in this article, any individual for whom the compliance agent does not possess documentary evidence of compliance with, or exemption from, the compulsory minimum training standards established by the Board for unarmed security officers and before January 1, 2003, maintain documentary evidence that an investigation to determine suitability has been conducted.

Employ or otherwise utilize as an electronic security technician’s assistant, except as provided in this article, any individual for whom the compliance agent does not possess documentary evidence of compliance with, or exemption from, the compulsory minimum training standards established by the Board for electronic security technician’s assistants.

Any person convicted of a violation of subsections A or B shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1976, c. 737, § 54-729.34; 1980, c. 425, § 54.1-1908; 1988, cc. 48, 765; 1992, c. 578, § 9-183.9; 1994, cc. 45, 810; 1995, c. 79; 1998, cc. 122, 807; 2001, c. 844; 2002, cc. 578, 597.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 578 and 597 are identical, and inserted “before January 1, 2003, maintain” in subdivision B 1.

§ 9.1-149.1.
Unlawful advertisement for regulated services; notice; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to place before the public through any medium an advertisement for services in the Commonwealth requiring a license, certification, or registration under this article unless the individual who will perform such services possesses the necessary license, certification, or registration at the time of the posting.

Whenever the Board receives information that an advertisement has been placed in violation of this section, the Board shall provide notice to the entity publishing the advertisement to the public.

Any person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2014, c. 396.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 felonies, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 9.1-150.
Monetary penalty.

Any person required to be licensed, certified or registered by the Board pursuant to this article who violates any statute or Board regulation who is not criminally prosecuted is subject to the monetary penalty provided in this section. If the Board determines that such person has violated any statute or Board regulation, the Board shall determine the amount of the monetary penalty for the violation, which shall not exceed $2,500 for each violation. The penalty may be sued for and recovered in the name of the Commonwealth. The monetary penalty shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Literary Fund in accordance with §

19.2-353

.

History.

1992, c. 578, § 9-183.12; 1994, c. 810; 1998, cc. 122, 807; 2001, c. 844; 2011, cc. 821, 854.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 821 and 854 are identical, and in the first sentence, inserted “required to be” and substituted “is subject to” for “shall be subject to,” and in the second sentence, substituted “determines that such person has violated any statute or Board regulation” for “determines that a respondent is guilty of the violation complained of.”